Hawaii, session 2025, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291C-107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  The department of transportation or a county shall consider the following factors when setting a maximum speed limit pursuant to section 291C-102: (1)  An engineering study conducted for the road whose maximum speed limit is being set[; provided that the engineering study], which shall include an analysis of the current speed distribution of free-flowing vehicles; provided [further] that [the requirements of] this paragraph shall not apply when the department of transportation or any county reduces a maximum speed limit within [one]: (A)  One mile of a school; and (B)  Ten miles per hour of the current speed limit for that road; (2)  For sections of highways with residential or commercial areas or schools immediately adjacent to the roadway, the department of transportation or a county shall, to the extent practicable, consider guidance provided by the National Association of City Transportation Officials; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to supersede any applicable federal standards or requirements; and [(2)] (3)  Any other factors prescribed by the Federal Highway Administration's Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as amended." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.